Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 51 Creation of Low THC Oil Research Program

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 49, § 1-1/HB 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Haleigh’s Hope Act.’ ”

Code Section 31-51-10 provides for the repeal of this chapter effective July 1, 2020.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 enactment of this chapter, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 153 (2015).

31-51-1 through 31-51-10.

Reserved. Repealed pursuant to Code Section 31-51-10, which provided for the repeal of this chapter, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor’s notes.

This chapter consisted of Code Sections 31-51-1 through 31-51-10, relating to the creation of a low THC oil research program, and was based on Ga. L. 2015, p. 49, § 4-1/HB 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 31/HB 737.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 31(4)/HB 497, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, reserved the designation of this chapter, effective May 10, 2021.